District of Columbia statutes.
9-1103.05

Congressional consent conditioned on nonuse of Compact to break a lawful strike.

The consent and approval of Congress set forth in § 9-1103.01 is given on the express condition that § 13(a) of Article XI and § 3(d) of Article XII of such Compact shall not be used to break a lawful strike by the employees of any carrier authorized to provide service pursuant to such Compact.

Sept. 15, 1960, 74 Stat. 1050, Pub. L. 86-794, § 4
1981 Ed., § 1-2415.
1973 Ed., § 1-1413.
This section was enacted prior to revision of the Compact. References to specific sections of the Compact have been updated following revision of the Compact.